Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1227
Motor vehicle ambulance; driver privileges.

The driver of a licensed motor vehicle ambulance who holds a valid driver's license issued by the state of his or her residence may exercise the privileges set forth in Nebraska statutes relating to emergency vehicles when responding to an emergency call or while transporting a patient.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5187;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 511.